West Virginia, session 2026, HB4888.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 13. GUIDELINES FOR CHILD SUPPORT AWARDS. PART 2. CALCULATION OF CHILD SUPPORT ORDER. §48-13-201. Use of both parents' income Income used in determining child support. (a) A child support order is determined by dividing the total child support obligation between the parents in proportion to their income. Both parents' adjusted gross income is used to determine the amount of child support.(b) When a court allocates custodial responsibility so that, except to the extent required under §48-9-209 of this code, the custodial time the child spends with each parent shall be equal (50-50) and both parents work, there shall be no child support payments sent by either parent.